Nebraska, session 109, LB351.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB351 LB351
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 83-338, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-338 (1) State hospitals for the mentally ill shall prioritize the
following patients for admission If at any time it becomes necessary, for
lack of capacity or other cause, to establish priorities for the
admission of patients into the state hospitals for the mentally ill,
admission shall be limited to: (a) Patients whose care in the state
hospital is necessary in order to protect the public health and safety;
(b) defendants who are determined by a court to be incompetent to stand
trial and who remain lodged in the county jail; and (c) patients
committed by a mental health board under the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act, by a district court,
or by a tribal court as provided in section 71-964 or 71-1226.01 ; (d)
patients who are most likely to be benefited by treatment in the state
hospitals, regardless of whether such patients are committed by a mental
health board or whether such patients seek voluntary admission to one of
the state hospitals; and (e) when cases are equally meritorious, in all
other respects, patients who are indigent.
(2) The Lincoln Regional Center shall provide a minimum number of
beds equal to the following percentages of total available capacity:
(a) Ten percent for patients entering the facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(a) of this section;
(b) Ten percent for patients entering the facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(b) of this section;
(c) Thirty percent for patients entering the facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) of this section;
(d) Ten percent for patients entering the facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(d) of this section;
(e) Ten percent for patients entering the facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(e) of this section; and
(f) Thirty percent to remain unallocated for the Department of
-2-

LB351 LB351
2025 2025
Health and Human Services to allocate according to the priorities
established in subsection (1) of this section as needed to reduce
existing waiting lists.
(2) (3) Beginning on or before November 1, 2022, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall make available on its website a weekly
report on the capacity and status of state-operated mental health
facilities, including, but not limited to, the capacity and wait times
associated with each priority category established in subsection (1) of
this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 83-338, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-